South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3869.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) clothing required by current good manufacturing practices pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Section 111.10 at perishable prepared food manufacturing facilities defined by the North American Industry Classification System 311991 to prevent health hazards, including outer garments, gloves of an impermeable material, hairnets, headbands, beard covers, caps, hair covers or other effective hair restraints, and other attire required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Section 110.10 for persons working in direct contact with food, food contact services, and food packaging materials to protect against contamination of food in perishable prepared food manufacturing facilities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies to tax years beginning after 2025. ----XX----